Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4037.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CITY AND COUNTY HOUSING PROJECT FUNDING PROGRAMS
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 307.213 to
307.237.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in ORS 307.213 to 307.237, “eligible housing project” means a
project to construct housing, or to convert a building from a nonresidential use to housing,
that is:
(a) Affordable to households with low income or moderate income as those terms are
defined in ORS 458.610;
(b) If for-sale property, a single-family dwelling, middle housing as defined in ORS
197A.420 or a multifamily dwelling that is affordable as described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection for a period determined in accordance with subsection (2) of this section; or
(c) If rental property:
(A)(i) Middle housing as defined in ORS 197A.420;
(ii) A multifamily dwelling;
(iii) An accessory dwelling unit as defined in ORS 215.501; or
(iv) Any other form of affordable housing or moderate income housing; and
(B) Rented at a monthly rate that is affordable to households with an annual income not
greater than 120 percent of the area median income, such affordability to be maintained for
a period determined in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The affordability of eligible housing project property shall be maintained for at
least as long as the agency loan related to the property remains outstanding.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department may establish terms and conditions by which the affordability restrictions
may be terminated upon foreclosure of the property by a permitted mortgage lender.
SECTION 3. ORS 307.213 is amended to read:
307.213. As used in ORS 307.213 to 307.237:
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 1

(1) “Agency loan” means a loan made by the Housing and Community Services Department
pursuant to a program adopted under ORS 307.221.
(2) “Assessor,” “tax collector” and “treasurer” mean the individual filling that county office so
named or any county officer performing the functions of the office under another name.
(3) “County tax officers” and “tax officers” mean the assessor, tax collector and treasurer of a
county.
(4) “Eligible costs” means the following costs associated with an eligible housing project:
(a) Infrastructure costs, including, but not limited to, system development charges;
(b) Predevelopment costs;
(c) Construction costs; and
(d) Land write-downs.
(5) “Eligible housing project” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2026 Act.
[means a project to construct housing, or to convert a building from a nonresidential use to housing,
that is:]
[(a) Affordable to households with low income or moderate income as those terms are defined in
ORS 458.610;]
[(b) If for-sale property, a single-family dwelling, middle housing as defined in ORS 197A.420 or
a multifamily dwelling that is affordable as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection continuously
from initial sale for a period, to be established by the Housing and Community Services Department
and the sponsoring jurisdiction, of not less than the term of the agency loan related to the for-sale
property; or]
[(c) If rental property:]
[(A)(i) Middle housing as defined in ORS 197A.420;]
[(ii) A multifamily dwelling;]
[(iii) An accessory dwelling unit as defined in ORS 215.501; or]
[(iv) Any other form of affordable housing or moderate income housing; and]
[(B) Rented at a monthly rate that is affordable to households with an annual income not greater
than 120 percent of the area median income, such affordability to be maintained for a period, to be
established by the department and the sponsoring jurisdiction, of not less than the term of the agency
loan related to the rental property.]
(6) “Eligible housing project property” means the taxable real and personal property constitut-
ing the improvements of an eligible housing project.
(7) “Fee payer” means, for any property tax year, the person responsible for paying ad valorem
property taxes on eligible housing project property to which [a project grant awarded] project
funding under ORS 307.225 relates.
(8) “Fire district taxes” means property taxes levied by fire districts within whose territory all
or a portion of eligible housing project property is located.
(9) “Nonexempt property” means property other than eligible housing project property in the tax
account that includes eligible housing project property.
(10) “Nonexempt taxes” means the ad valorem property taxes assessed on nonexempt property.
(11) “Project funding” means a project grant or a project loan.
(12) “Project funding agreement” means an agreement entered into between a sponsoring juris-
diction and a developer under ORS 307.225 for a project grant or a project loan.
(13) “Project grant” means a grant awarded by a sponsoring jurisdiction under a project funding
program adopted pursuant to ORS 307.214.
(14) “Project loan” means a loan made by a sponsoring jurisdiction under a project funding
program adopted pursuant to ORS 307.214.
(15) “Sponsoring jurisdiction” means:
(a)(A) A city with respect to eligible housing projects located within the city boundaries; or
(B) A county with respect to eligible housing projects located in urban unincorporated areas of
the county; or
(b) The governing body of a city or county described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 2

SECTION 4. ORS 307.214 is amended to read:
307.214. (1)(a) A sponsoring jurisdiction may adopt by ordinance or resolution a project funding
program under which the sponsoring jurisdiction awards project grants and makes project loans to
developers for eligible costs.
(b) Before adopting the project funding program, the sponsoring jurisdiction shall consult with
the governing body of any city or county with territory inside the boundaries of the sponsoring ju-
risdiction.
(2) The ordinance or resolution shall set forth:
(a) The kinds of eligible housing projects for which a developer may seek project funding under
the program; and
(b) Any eligibility requirements to be imposed on projects and developers in addition to those
required under ORS 307.213 to 307.237.
(3)(a) A project grant and a project loan:
[(a)] (A) [Shall be in] May not exceed the amount determined under ORS 307.216 (3); [and]
[(b)] (B) May include reimbursement for eligible costs incurred for up to 12 months preceding
the date on which the eligible housing project received local site approval[.];
(C) Shall be secured by an affordable housing covenant, as defined in ORS 456.270, that:
(i) Is recorded in first position in the real property records of the county in which the
eligible housing project is located; and
(ii) Requires the project to remain affordable in accordance with section 2 of this 2026
Act; and
(D) May be transferred and assumed, in whole or in part, on terms and conditions es-
tablished by the Housing and Community Services Department or the sponsoring jurisdiction,
by any subsequent purchaser of the eligible housing project property or a portion of the
property.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)(C)(i) of this subsection, if the sponsoring jurisdiction
has pledged in repayment of the agency loan its full faith and credit and taxing authority and
an alternative source of revenue acceptable to the department under ORS 307.223, the de-
partment may establish terms and conditions by which the affordable housing covenant may
be made subordinate to a primary deed of trust, mortgage or other security instrument se-
curing financing for the eligible housing project property.
(4)(a) Eligible housing project property [for which a developer receives a project grant for eligible
costs] that is granted exemption under ORS 307.227 may not be granted any other exemption,
partial exemption or special assessment of ad valorem property taxes [other than the exemption
granted under ORS 307.227].
(b) [A sponsoring jurisdiction may not award a project grant to a developer under ORS 307.216
for an] Eligible housing project property that is located in an urban renewal area may not be
granted exemption under ORS 307.227.
(5) A sponsoring jurisdiction may amend an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this
section at any time. The amendments shall apply only to applications submitted under ORS 307.216
on or after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution.
SECTION 5. ORS 307.216 is amended to read:
307.216. (1)(a) A sponsoring jurisdiction that adopts a project funding program pursuant to ORS
307.214 shall prescribe an application process, including forms and deadlines, by which a developer
may apply for project funding with respect to an eligible housing project.
(b) An application for project funding must include, at a minimum:
(A) A description of the eligible housing project;
(B) A detailed explanation of the affordability of the eligible housing project;
(C) An itemized description of the eligible costs for which the project funding is sought;
(D) The proposed schedule for completion of the eligible housing project;
(E) A project pro forma demonstrating that the project would not be economically feasible but
for receipt of the project funding moneys; and
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 3

(F) Any other information, documentation or attestation that the sponsoring jurisdiction con-
siders necessary or convenient for the application review process.
(c)(A) The project pro forma under paragraph (b)(E) of this subsection shall be on a form pro-
vided to the sponsoring jurisdiction by the Housing and Community Services Department and made
available to [grant] project funding applicants.
(B) The department may enter into an agreement with a third party to develop the project pro
forma template.
(2)(a) The review of an application under this section shall be completed within 90 days follow-
ing the receipt of the application by the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) The sponsoring jurisdiction may in its sole discretion extend the review process beyond 90
days if the volume of applications would make timely completion of the review process unlikely.
(B) The sponsoring jurisdiction may consult with a developer about the developer’s application,
and the developer, after the consultation, may amend the application on or before a deadline set by
the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(3) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall:
(a) Review each application;
(b) Provide the tax officers of the county in which the eligible housing project property is lo-
cated with the estimated real market value and tax lot information of the property;
(c) Request that the county tax officers provide to the sponsoring jurisdiction the increment
determined under ORS 307.218;
(d) Set the term of the agency loan that will fund the project funding award for a period not to
exceed the greater of:
(A) Ten years following July 1 of the first property tax year for which the completed eligible
housing project property is estimated to be taken into account; or
(B) If agreed upon by the sponsoring jurisdiction and the department, the period required for the
agency loan principal, and fees, if any, to be repaid in full;
(e) Set the amount of the project funding that may be awarded to the developer under ORS
307.225 (2) by multiplying the increment determined under ORS 307.218 by the term of the agency
loan; and
(f)(A) Provisionally approve the application as submitted;
(B) Provisionally approve the application on terms other than those requested in the application;
or
(C) Reject the application.
(4)(a) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall forward provisionally approved applications to the
[Housing and Community Services] department.
(b) The department shall review the provisionally approved applications for completeness, in-
cluding, but not limited to, the completeness of the project pro forma submitted with the application
under subsection (1)(b)(E) of this section and the increment computed under ORS 307.218, and notify
the sponsoring jurisdiction of its determination.
(5)(a) If the department has determined that a provisionally approved application is incomplete,
the sponsoring jurisdiction may:
(A) Consult with the applicant developer and reconsider the provisionally approved application
after the applicant revises it; or
(B) Reject the provisionally approved application.
(b) If the department has determined that a provisionally approved application is complete, the
approval shall be final.
(c) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall notify each applicant and the department of the final ap-
proval or rejection of an application and the amount of the project funding award.
(d) The rejection of an application and the amount of a project grant award or project loan
may not be appealed, but a developer may reapply for project funding at any time within the appli-
cable deadlines of the project funding program for the same or another eligible housing project.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 4

(6) Upon request by a sponsoring jurisdiction, the department may assist the sponsoring juris-
diction with, or perform on behalf of the sponsoring jurisdiction, any duty required under this sec-
tion.
SECTION 6. ORS 307.221 is amended to read:
307.221. (1)(a) The Housing and Community Services Department shall develop a program to
make agency loans to sponsoring jurisdictions to fund project grants and project loans awarded
under the sponsoring jurisdiction’s project funding program adopted pursuant to ORS 307.214.
(b) The agency loans shall be interest free for the term set by the sponsoring jurisdiction under
ORS 307.216.
(2) For each application approved under ORS 307.216 (5)(b), the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department shall:
(a) Enter into an agency loan agreement with the sponsoring jurisdiction for a payment in an
amount equal to the total of:
(A) The agency loan proceeds in an amount equal to the project funding award for the applica-
tion set under ORS 307.216 (3); and
(B) The administrative costs set forth in subsection (3) of this section; and
(b) Pay to the sponsoring jurisdiction the total amount set forth in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section out of the Housing Project Revolving Loan Fund established under ORS 307.237.
(3) The administrative costs referred to in subsection (2)(a)(B) of this section are:
(a) An amount not greater than five percent of the agency loan proceeds to reimburse the
sponsoring jurisdiction for the costs of administering the project funding program, other than the
costs of tax administration; and
(b) An amount equal to one percent of the agency loan proceeds to be transferred to the county
in which the sponsoring jurisdiction is situated to reimburse the county for the costs of the tax
administration of the project funding program by the county tax officers.
(4) The Housing and Community Services Department may:
(a) In order to maximize repayment and compliance with affordability requirements:
(A) Compromise, adjust or modify agency loans; and
(B) Adjust, modify, subordinate or release the terms of contracts, agreements or re-
strictions entered into in connection with agency loans.
(b) Assign any and all agency loan amounts made under this section to the Department of Re-
venue for collection as provided in ORS 293.250.
(5) The Housing and Community Services Department may:
(a) Consult with the Oregon Business Development Department about any of the powers and
duties conferred on the Housing and Community Services Department by ORS 307.213 to 307.237;
and
(b) Adopt any rule it considers necessary or convenient for the administration of ORS 307.213
to 307.237 by the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 7. ORS 307.225 is amended to read:
307.225. (1) Upon entering into an agency loan agreement with the Housing and Community
Services Department under ORS 307.221, a sponsoring jurisdiction shall offer a project funding
agreement to each developer whose application for project funding was approved under ORS 307.216
(5)(b).
(2) The project funding agreement shall:
(a) Include a project grant award or project loan in the amount set under ORS 307.216 (3); and
(b) Contain terms that:
(A) Are required under ORS 307.213 to 307.237 or the ordinance or resolution adopted by the
sponsoring jurisdiction pursuant to ORS 307.214.
(B) Do not conflict with ORS 307.213 to 307.237 or the ordinance or resolution adopted by the
sponsoring jurisdiction pursuant to ORS 307.214.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 5

[(3) Upon entering into a project funding agreement with a developer, a sponsoring jurisdiction
shall adopt an ordinance or resolution setting forth the details of the eligible housing project that is
the subject of the project funding agreement, including but not limited to:]
[(a) With respect to a project grant or a project loan:]
[(A) A description of the eligible housing project;]
[(B) An itemized description of the eligible costs;]
[(C) The amount and terms of the grant project award or project loan principal; and]
[(D) A statement declaring that the project funding has been awarded in response to the housing
needs of communities within the sponsoring jurisdiction; and]
[(b) With respect to a project grant, written notice that the eligible housing project property is ex-
empt from property taxation in accordance with ORS 307.227.]
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, upon entering into a project
funding agreement with a developer, a sponsoring jurisdiction shall adopt an ordinance or
resolution setting forth the details of the eligible housing project that is the subject of the
project funding agreement, including but not limited to:
(A) A description of the eligible housing project;
(B) A statement indicating whether the eligible housing project property is exempt from
property taxation under ORS 307.227;
(C) An itemized description of the eligible costs;
(D) The amount and terms of the grant project award or project loan principal; and
(E) A statement declaring that the project funding has been awarded in response to the
housing needs of communities within the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(b) A sponsoring jurisdiction is not required to adopt an ordinance or resolution under
paragraph (a) of this subsection if:
(A) The ordinance or resolution adopted under ORS 307.214 delegates authority to review
developer applications under ORS 307.216 to a designated authority;
(B) The sponsoring jurisdiction has agreed to repay the agency loan in accordance with
ORS 307.223; and
(C) The eligible housing project property will not be exempt from property taxation under
ORS 307.227.
(4) Unless otherwise specified in the project funding agreement, as soon as practicable after the
ordinance or resolution required under subsection (3) of this section becomes effective, the spon-
soring jurisdiction shall distribute the agency loan proceeds received from the department under
ORS 307.221 (2)(a)(A) to the developer as the project grant moneys or project loan principal awarded
under this section.
(5) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall forward to the tax officers of the county in which the eli-
gible housing project is located a copy of the project funding agreement, the ordinance or resolution
and any other material the sponsoring jurisdiction considers necessary for the tax officers to per-
form their duties under ORS 307.213 to 307.237 or the ordinance or resolution.
(6)(a)(A) Upon request, the department may assist [the] a sponsoring jurisdiction with, or per-
form on behalf of the sponsoring jurisdiction, any duty required under this section.
(B) Upon request, any city or county may assist a sponsoring jurisdiction with, or per-
form on behalf of the sponsoring jurisdiction, any duty required under this section or ORS
307.216.
(b) The department may take any action with respect to a city or county assisting a
sponsoring jurisdiction under this subsection that it may take with respect to the sponsoring
jurisdiction itself.
SECTION 8. ORS 307.227 is amended to read:
307.227. (1) Upon receipt of the copy of a project [grant] funding agreement and ordinance or
resolution from the sponsoring jurisdiction under ORS 307.225 (5) that grants exemption under
this section to eligible housing project property, the assessor of the county in which eligible
housing project property is located shall:
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 6

(a) Exempt the eligible housing project property in accordance with this section;
(b) Assess and tax the nonexempt property in the tax account as other similar property is as-
sessed and taxed; and
(c) Submit a written report to the sponsoring jurisdiction setting forth the assessor’s estimate
of the amount of:
(A) The real market value of the exempt eligible housing project property; and
(B) The property taxes on the exempt eligible housing project property that would have been
collected if the property were not exempt.
(2)(a) The exemption shall first apply to the first property tax year that begins after completion
of the eligible housing project to which the [grant] project funding relates.
(b) The eligible housing project property shall be disqualified from the exemption on the earliest
of:
(A) July 1 of the property tax year immediately succeeding the date on which the fee payment
obligation under ORS 307.231 that relates to the eligible housing project, if any, is repaid in full;
(B) The date on which the annual fee imposed on the fee payer under ORS 307.231, if any, be-
comes delinquent;
(C) The date on which foreclosure proceedings are commenced as provided by law for delinquent
nonexempt taxes assessed with respect to the tax account that includes the eligible housing project;
or
(D) The date on which a condition specified in ORS 307.233 (1) occurs.
(c) After the eligible housing project property has been disqualified from the exemption under
this subsection, the property shall be assessed and taxed as other similar property is assessed and
taxed.
(3) For each tax year that the eligible housing project property is exempt from taxation, the
assessor shall enter a notation on the assessment roll stating:
(a) That the property is exempt under this section; and
(b) The presumptive number of property tax years for which the exemption is granted, which
shall be the term of the agency loan agreement relating to the eligible housing project set under
ORS 307.216.
SECTION 9. ORS 307.229 is amended to read:
307.229. (1) Repayment of agency loans made under ORS 307.221 shall begin, in accordance with
ORS 307.231, after completion of the eligible housing project funded by the project grant or project
loan to which the agency loan relates, or after another date or other circumstances agreed to by
the parties to a project funding agreement under ORS 307.223.
(2)(a) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall determine the date of completion of an eligible housing
project.
(b)(A) If an eligible housing project is completed before July 1 of the assessment year, repayment
shall begin with the property tax year that begins on July 1 of the assessment year.
(B) If an eligible housing project is completed on or after July 1 of the assessment year, repay-
ment shall begin with the property tax year that begins on July 1 of the succeeding assessment year.
(c) After determining the date of completion under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the spon-
soring jurisdiction shall notify the Housing and Community Services Department and the county tax
officers of the determination.
(3)(a) [A] An agency loan shall remain outstanding until repaid in full.
(b) An agency loan may be repaid at any time.
(4) Upon payment in full of an agency loan, the sponsoring jurisdiction may release or
modify any affordability restrictions applicable to the eligible housing project property to
which the agency loan relates.
SECTION 10. ORS 307.231 is amended to read:
307.231. (1) Unless repayment of the agency loan made under ORS 307.221 has been otherwise
provided for under ORS 307.223, the fee payer for eligible housing project property that has been
granted exemption under ORS 307.227 shall pay an annual fee for the term that shall be the
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 7

presumptive number of property tax years for which the property is granted exemption under ORS
307.227 (3)(b).
(2)(a) The amount of the fee for the first property tax year in which repayment of the agency
loan is due under ORS 307.229 (1) shall equal the total of:
(A) The portion of the increment determined under ORS 307.218 that is attributable to the eli-
gible housing project property to which the fee relates; and
(B) The administrative costs described in ORS 307.221 (3) divided by the term in years of the
project [grant] funding agreement entered into under ORS 307.225.
(b) For each subsequent property tax year, the amount of the fee shall be 103 percent of the
amount of the fee for the preceding property tax year.
(3)(a) Not later than July 15 of each property tax year during the term of the fee obligation, the
sponsoring jurisdiction shall certify to the assessor each fee amount that became due under this
section on or after July 16 of the previous property tax year from fee payers with respect to eligible
housing projects located in the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(b) The assessor shall place each fee amount on the assessment and tax rolls of the county and
notify:
(A) The sponsoring jurisdiction of each fee amount and the aggregate of all fee amounts imposed
with respect to eligible housing project property located in the sponsoring jurisdiction.
(B) The Housing and Community Services Department of each fee amount and the aggregate of
all fee amounts with respect to all eligible housing project property located in the county.
(4)(a) The assessor shall include on the tax statement of each tax account that includes exempt
eligible housing project property the amount of the fee imposed on the fee payer with respect to the
eligible housing project property.
(b) The fee shall be collected and enforced in the same manner as ad valorem property taxes,
including nonexempt taxes, are collected and enforced.
(5)(a) For each property tax year in which a fee is payable under this section, the treasurer
shall:
(A) Estimate the amount of operating taxes as defined in ORS 310.055 and local option taxes as
defined in ORS 310.202 levied by fire districts that would have been collected on eligible housing
project property if the property were not exempt;
(B) Distribute out of the fee moneys the estimated amounts determined under subparagraph (A)
of this paragraph to the respective fire districts when other ad valorem property taxes are distrib-
uted under ORS 311.395; and
(C) Transfer the net fee moneys to the [Housing and Community Services] department for deposit
in the Housing Project Revolving Loan Fund established under ORS 307.237 in repayment of the
loans to which the fees relate.
(b) Nonexempt taxes shall be distributed in the same manner as other ad valorem property taxes
are distributed.
(6) Any person with an interest in the eligible housing project property on the date on which
any fee amount becomes due shall be jointly and severally liable for payment of the fee amount.
(7) Any agency loan amounts that have not been repaid when the fee payer has discharged its
obligations in full under this section remain the obligation of the sponsoring jurisdiction that ob-
tained the agency loan from the department under ORS 307.221.
(8) Any fee amounts collected in excess of the agency loan amount shall be distributed in the
same manner as other ad valorem property taxes are distributed.
SECTION 11. ORS 307.233 is amended to read:
307.233. (1)(a) A developer that received a project [grant] funding award under ORS 307.225
shall become liable for immediate payment of outstanding annual fee payments, if any, imposed un-
der ORS 307.231 for the entire term of the fee if:
(A) The developer has not completed the eligible housing project within three years following
the date on which the project [grant] funding moneys were distributed to the developer;
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 8

(B) The eligible housing project changes substantially from the project for which the developer’s
application was approved such that the project would not have been eligible for the project [grant]
funding; or
(C) The developer has not complied with a requirement specified in the project [grant] funding
agreement or with associated affordability requirements and restrictions.
(b) The sponsoring jurisdiction may, in its sole discretion, extend the date on which the eligible
housing project must be completed.
[(2) If the sponsoring jurisdiction discovers that a developer willfully made a false statement or
misrepresentation or willfully failed to report a material fact to obtain a project grant with respect to
an eligible housing project, the sponsoring jurisdiction may impose on the developer a penalty not to
exceed 20 percent of the amount of the project grant so obtained, plus any applicable interest and fees
associated with the costs of collection.]
(2) A sponsoring jurisdiction may impose on a developer, homeowner or other project
representative a penalty not to exceed 20 percent of the amount of the project funding ob-
tained with respect to an eligible housing project, plus any applicable interest and fees as-
sociated with the costs of collection, upon discovery that the developer, homeowner or other
project representative willfully made a false statement or misrepresentation or willfully
failed to report a material fact:
(a) To obtain the project funding; or
(b) Relating to the compliance requirements associated with the eligible housing project.
(3) Any amounts imposed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be a lien on the eligible
housing project property and the nonexempt property in the tax account.
(4) The sponsoring jurisdiction shall provide written notice of any amounts that become due
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section to the county tax officers and the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department.
(5)(a) Any and all amounts required to be paid under this section shall be considered to be liq-
uidated and delinquent, and the Housing and Community Services Department shall assign such
amounts to the Department of Revenue for collection as provided in ORS 293.250.
(b) Amounts collected under this subsection shall be deposited, net of any collection charges, in
the Housing Project Revolving Loan Fund established under ORS 307.237.
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
SECTION 12. ORS 458.352 is amended to read:
458.352. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Average income” means an income that complies with income restrictions determined at the
advice and consent of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, but not to exceed the greater of 100
percent of the statewide or local area median income adjusted for household size as determined
annually by the Housing and Community Services Department using United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development information.
(b) “Manufactured dwelling park” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(c) “Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation that is exempt from income taxes under section
501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2016.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide one or more loans to
nonprofit corporations to create manufactured dwelling park preservation and development pro-
grams that invest in, and provide loans for, the preservation, development and expansion of afford-
able manufactured dwelling parks in this state, including through:
(a) The repair or reconstruction of parks destroyed by natural disasters; or
(b) The acquisition and development of land for parks or for the expansion of parks in areas that
have been affected by a natural disaster.
(3) To be eligible for a loan under this section, a nonprofit corporation shall demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the department that the nonprofit corporation:
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 9

(a) Is a community development financial institution, or was certified on October 1, 2025, as
a community development financial institution by the Community Development Financial
Institutions Fund at the United States Department of the Treasury;
(b) Is operating statewide to support investment in, and acquisition, renovation and con-
struction of, affordable housing;
[(b)] (c) Has the ability and capacity to provide the services and reporting required of the pro-
gram described in subsections (4) and (6) of this section; and
[(c)] (d) Meets other requirements established by the department regarding financial risk and
availability or accessibility of additional resources.
(4) An eligible nonprofit corporation, with input from the department, shall develop a manufac-
tured dwelling park development and preservation program that:
(a) Invests in, and loans funds to, other nonprofit corporations, housing authorities, manufac-
tured dwelling park nonprofit cooperatives as defined in ORS 62.803, local units of government as
defined in ORS 466.706, agencies as defined in ORS 183.310, or any entity in which a nonprofit cor-
poration has a controlling share, to:
(A) Purchase or refinance manufactured dwelling parks that will maintain the parks as parks
long term; or
(B) Construct, develop, expand, repair or reconstruct parks, including parks destroyed by na-
tural disasters;
(b) Emphasizes, when providing loans under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the financing of
parks whose residents are predominantly members of households with income less than average in-
come; and
(c) Preserves the affordability of the park space rent to park tenants who are members of
households with income less than average income.
(5) An eligible nonprofit corporation shall create a park development and preservation account
to be used by the nonprofit corporation for the manufactured dwelling park preservation program
and shall deposit the moneys loaned by the department into the account.
(6) An eligible nonprofit corporation shall ensure that all financial activities of the program are
paid from and into the park development and preservation account created under subsection (5) of
this section. Each nonprofit corporation shall report to the department no less than semiannually,
showing the expenses and incomes of the park development and preservation account and the results
of the manufactured dwelling park development and preservation program.
(7) A loan made by the department under this section:
(a) May require the nonprofit corporation to pay interest.
(b) May not require the nonprofit corporation to make any loan payments before the maturity
date of the loan.
(c) Must have a maturity date of no later than September 15, 2036.
(d) May have its maturity date extended by the department.
(e) Shall have all or part of the unpaid balance forgiven by the department in an amount not
to exceed the losses incurred on investments or loans made by the nonprofit corporation under
subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(f) May include such agreements by the nonprofit corporation practical to secure the loan made
by the department and to accomplish the purposes of the program described in subsection (4) of this
section.
(8) The department or the State Treasurer shall deposit moneys received in servicing the loan
into the General Housing Account of the Oregon Housing Fund created under ORS 458.620.
SECTION 13. The Housing and Community Services Department, Oregon Department of
Administrative Services or Department of Justice shall amend the grant agreement with
Network for Oregon Affordable Housing (NOAH) made under section 51, chapter 13, Oregon
Laws 2023, to allow the grant and proceeds from the grant to be used for financing:
(1) Housing projects that will:
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 10

(a) Have an affordability term of no less than five years, notwithstanding section 51
(2)(a), chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023.
(b) Be sold or rented as the primary residence for a household with an income less than
or equal to 120 percent and greater than 60 percent of the area median income, as defined
in ORS 456.270, notwithstanding section 51 (2)(b), chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023.
(2) Not to exceed $1,000,000 per eligible project, notwithstanding section 51 (3)(a), chapter
13, Oregon Laws 2023.
NOTE: Section 14 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
LAND CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
COMMISSION ORDERS
SECTION 15. ORS 197.320 is amended to read:
197.320. The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall issue an order requiring a
local government, state agency or special district to take action necessary to bring its comprehen-
sive plan, land use regulation, limited land use decisions or other land use decisions or actions into
compliance with the goals, acknowledged comprehensive plan provisions, land use regulations,
housing production strategy or housing acceleration agreements if the commission has good cause
to believe:
(1) A comprehensive plan or land use regulation adopted by a local government not on a com-
pliance schedule is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245 or 197.250 for
such compliance.
(2) A plan, program, rule or regulation affecting land use adopted by a state agency or special
district is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245 or 197.250 for such
compliance.
(3) A local government is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its compliance
schedule.
(4) A state agency is not making satisfactory progress in carrying out its coordination agree-
ment or the requirements of ORS 197.180.
(5) A local government has no comprehensive plan or land use regulation and is not on a com-
pliance schedule directed to developing the plan or regulation.
(6) A local government has engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making that violates an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or land use regulation. In making its determination under this
subsection, the commission shall determine whether there is evidence in the record to support the
decisions made. The commission shall not judge the issue solely upon adequacy of the findings in
support of the decisions.
(7) A local government has failed to comply with a commission order entered under ORS 197.644.
(8) A special district has engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making that violates an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or cooperative agreement adopted pursuant to ORS 197.020.
(9) A special district is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its obligations
under ORS chapters 195, 197 and 197A.
(10) A local government’s approval standards, special conditions on approval of specific devel-
opment proposals or procedures for approval do not comply with ORS 197A.400 [(1) or (3)].
(11) A local government is not making satisfactory progress toward meeting its obligations un-
der ORS 195.065.
(12) A local government within the jurisdiction of a metropolitan service district has failed to
make changes to the comprehensive plan or land use regulations to comply with the regional
framework plan of the district or has engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making that vio-
lates a requirement of the regional framework plan.
(13) A city [with a population of 10,000 or greater, as defined in ORS 197A.015,] that:
(a) Has a pattern or practice of violating housing-related statutes or implementing policies that
create unreasonable cost or delay to the production of housing [as described in ORS 197A.400 (1)];
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 11

(b) Has a pattern or practice of creating adverse disparate impacts to state or federal protected
classes or inhibiting equitable access to housing choice[, as described in ORS 197A.100 (2)(b) to
(d)];
(c) Has failed to enter into a housing acceleration agreement as required under ORS 197A.130
(6); or
(d) Has materially breached a term of a housing acceleration agreement under ORS 197A.130 (8),
including a failure to meet the timeline for performance under ORS 197A.130 (8)(a)(A).
BUILDING PLAN REVIEW
SECTION 16. ORS 455.628 is amended to read:
455.628. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business Services or a municipality administering
and enforcing a building inspection program under ORS 455.148 or 455.150 may not require a plan
review for one and two family dwellings [that are of conventional light frame construction, as defined
by the department by rule], if:
(a) The plans for the dwelling are designed and stamped by a professional engineer registered
under ORS 672.002 to 672.325 or an architect registered under ORS 671.010 to 671.220; and
(b) The engineer or architect is certified by the Director of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services under ORS 455.720 as being qualified to examine one and two family dwelling
plans.
(2) The department or municipality is exempt from liability for any damages arising from the
nonperformance of a plan review pursuant to this section.
REVIEW OF HOUSING APPLICATIONS
SECTION 17. ORS 197A.400 is amended to read:
197A.400. (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a local government may
adopt and apply only clear and objective standards, conditions and procedures regulating:
(A) The development of housing; and
(B) Tree removal [codes] related to the development of housing.
(b) The standards, conditions and procedures:
(A) May include, but are not limited to, one or more provisions regulating the density or height
of a development.
(B) May not have the effect, either in themselves or cumulatively, of discouraging needed
housing through unreasonable cost or delay.
(C) May be contained in a comprehensive plan, land use regulation or an ordinance relating to
housing adopted by a city that adopts, including by reference, a model ordinance adopted by the
Land Conservation and Development Commission that comports with any qualifications, conditions
or applicability of the model ordinance.
(c) This subsection applies only within:
(A) An urban growth boundary;
(B) An unincorporated community designated in a county’s acknowledged comprehensive plan
after December 5, 1994;
(C) Nonresource land; or
(D) An area zoned for rural residential use as defined in ORS 215.501.
(2) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to:
(a) An application or permit for residential development in an area identified in a formally
adopted central city plan, or a regional center as defined by Metro, in a city with a population of
500,000 or greater.
(b) An application or permit for residential development in historic areas designated for pro-
tection under a land use planning goal protecting historic areas.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 12

(3) In addition to an approval process for needed housing based on clear and objective stand-
ards, conditions and procedures as provided in subsection (1) of this section, a local government may
adopt and apply an alternative approval process for applications and permits for residential devel-
opment based on approval criteria that are not clear and objective if:
(a) The applicant retains the option of proceeding under the approval process that meets the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The approval criteria for the alternative approval process comply with applicable statewide
land use planning goals and rules; and
(c) The approval criteria for the alternative approval process authorize a density at or above
the density level authorized in the zone under the approval process provided in subsection (1) of this
section.
(4) Subject to [subsection (1)] subsections (1) and (5) of this section, this section does not in-
fringe on a local government’s prerogative to:
(a) Set approval standards under which a particular housing type is permitted outright;
(b) Impose special conditions upon approval of a specific development proposal; or
(c) Establish approval procedures.
(5) For applications subject to subsection (1) of this section, the local government:
(a) May provide notice of the application only to owners of record of property on the
most recent property tax assessment roll where such property is located within 100 feet, or
within 500 feet for developments of 20 units or more, of the property that is the subject of
the notice;
(b) May not require a public hearing prior to making a decision on the application; and
(c) May provide an opportunity for a local appeal only to the applicant.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 197.825, only the applicant may appeal a decision made under
subsection (5) of this section to the Land Use Board of Appeals.
SECTION 18. The amendments to ORS 197A.400 by section 17 of this 2026 Act become
operative on July 1, 2026.
NOTE: Section 19 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
RESIDENTIAL TENANCIES IMPACTED BY DISASTERS
SECTION 20. Section 21 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 90.100 to
90.465.
SECTION 21. If a tenancy is affected by a natural disaster, as defined in ORS 197A.440,
unless the parties agree otherwise following the natural disaster:
(1) For a dwelling unit that is destroyed, the tenancy is immediately terminated and the
parties are not further obligated under the rental agreement or this chapter, except that:
(a) The landlord shall, pursuant to ORS 90.300, return to the tenant any deposit and
prepaid rent, including prorated rent from the date of the natural disaster.
(b) Unless a tenant is responsible for the natural disaster, the tenant is not responsible
for cleanup of the premises.
(c) After the abatement of the emergency, the landlord shall notify the tenant and pro-
vide the tenant an opportunity to return to the premises to search for valuables. The land-
lord may require the tenant to sign a release of liability related to the tenant’s presence at
the premises.
(2) If an occupant or tenant remains in the dwelling unit following termination of the
tenancy under subsection (1) of this section, the landlord may issue a termination notice in
the manner provided by ORS 90.380 (5)(b).
(3) A tenant does not owe rent while the dwelling unit is inaccessible due to the natural
disaster or the destruction of the dwelling unit. A dwelling unit is considered inaccessible
while a governmental agency has posted the dwelling unit as unsafe or unlawful to occupy.
(4) This section does not apply to rental agreements subject to ORS 90.505 to 90.850.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 13

USE OF STATE PROPERTY FOR HOUSING
SECTION 22. ORS 270.010 is amended to read:
270.010. [(1) It shall be] It is the policy of the State of Oregon to hold in state ownership no
more state-owned real property than is necessary to conduct official business, with allowance for
reasonably foreseeable demands of the future. The acquisition, sale, exchange, lease, retention and
management of state-owned real property shall be subject to a statewide plan that will encourage
the transfer through sale or lease of state-owned real property already in state ownership to private
ownership and use so as to minimize state investment in such land and place such land on the tax
rolls.
[(2) In transferring state-owned real property through sale or lease, to the extent consistent with
applicable trust responsibilities, the state policy shall be to give right of first refusal to purchase in the
following order:]
[(a) To the lessee of the land.]
[(b) Where the intended activity or use is similar to that of adjacent properties within the region:]
[(A) To adjacent landowners.]
[(B) To residents within the region.]
[(C) To persons outside the region.]
SECTION 23. ORS 270.100 is amended to read:
270.100. (1)[(a)] Before offering for sale any real property or equitable interest in real property
that the state owns, the state agency acting for the state in the sales transaction shall report to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services that the state agency intends to sell or transfer the
real property or the equitable interest. The department, or an agency the department specifically
designates, shall notify other state agencies authorized to own real property of the intended sale
or transfer to determine whether acquiring the real property or interest in the real property would
be advantageous to another state agency.
[(b)(A)] (2) To the extent consistent with applicable trust responsibilities, the department
shall give the [first opportunity after other state agencies] opportunity to acquire, purchase, ex-
change or lease real property or an interest in real property that the State of Oregon disposes of
or sells to the following, in order of priority:
(a) Other state agencies.
(b) Any lessee of the land.
[(i)] (c) The following entities, in order of priority, on the condition that the entities will de-
velop housing on the real property [that will be occupied by families and individuals with an income
no greater than 80 percent of the median family income for the county in which the real property is
located] only for households whose income is not greater than 120 percent of the area median
income:
[(I) Nonprofit organizations; and]
[(II)] (A) Indian tribes, as defined in ORS 97.740[; and].
[(ii)] (B) Political subdivisions, as defined in ORS 271.005.
(C) Nonprofit organizations or housing authorities as defined in ORS 456.005.
(D) Any person.
(d) The adjacent property owner, where the intended activity or use is similar to that of
adjacent properties within the region.
(e) Political subdivisions, as defined in ORS 271.005.
[(B) The state agency responsible for selling or transferring the property or the equitable interest
may require at the time of] Upon the sale or transfer, the department may require that a political
subdivision [must]:
(A) Use [state real property or an equitable interest in real property sold or transferred to the
political subdivision] the real property for a public purpose or benefit[, and that the political sub-
division].
(B) May not resell the real property or the equitable interest to a private purchaser.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 14

(f) The entities listed under paragraph (c) of this subsection, in order of priority, on the
condition that the entities will develop housing on the real property without regard to the
affordability of the housing.
[(c)] (3) If a state agency that intends to sell or transfer real property or an equitable interest
in real property has not disposed of the real property or the equitable interest under [paragraph (a)
or (b) of this] subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section, the state agency shall cause the real property
to be appraised by one or more competent and experienced appraisers in accordance with rules the
department adopts. Except as provided in ORS 273.825, if the property has an appraised value ex-
ceeding $5,000, the property or an equitable interest in the property may not be sold to any private
person except after notice calling for such proposals as set forth in ORS 270.130.
[(d)] (4) The department shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
[(2)] (5) Before a state agency acquires any real property or interest in real property, except for
highway right of way that the Department of Transportation acquires, park properties that the State
Parks and Recreation Department acquires and property within the approved projected campus
boundaries for public universities listed in ORS 352.002, the state agency shall report to the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services that the state agency intends to acquire the real property
or the interest in real property. The department shall notify other state agencies that own land that
the state agency intends to acquire real property or an interest in real property to determine
whether another state agency desires to sell or transfer property that would meet the needs of the
acquiring agency. In accordance with rules the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
adopts, if no other state agency desires to sell or transfer property that would meet the needs of the
agency that intends to acquire real property or an interest in real property, the agency may acquire
the real property or interest in real property, consistent with applicable provisions of law.
[(3)] (6) Before any terminal disposition of real property or an interest in real property, the state
agency acting for the state in the transaction must secure approval of the transaction from the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
[(4)] (7) Subsection [(3)] (6) of this section does not apply to terminal disposition of the following
real property:
(a) Property that the State Department of Fish and Wildlife controls;
(b) State forestlands that the State Forestry Department controls;
(c) Property that the Department of Transportation controls;
(d) Property that the Department of State Lands controls;
(e) Property that public universities listed in ORS 352.002 control;
(f) Property that the legislative branch of state government controls;
(g) Property that the judicial branch of state government controls; and
(h) Property that the State Parks and Recreation Department controls.
[(5)] (8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection [(4)] (7) of this section, prior approval by
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services is required for the terminal disposition of public
land for less than the fair market value of the public land.
[(6)] (9) The provisions of ORS 184.634, 270.005 to 270.015, 270.100 to 270.190, 273.416, 273.426
to 273.436, 273.551 and 308A.709 (1)(a) to (d) do not apply to:
(a) A home or farm that the Department of Veterans’ Affairs acquires or sells under ORS 88.720,
406.050, 407.135, 407.145, 407.375 or 407.377.
(b) Real property that the Housing and Community Services Department acquires or sells under
the provisions of ORS 456.515 to 456.828 or ORS chapter 458.
(c) Real property that the Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human Services ac-
quires or sells under ORS 410.075 or 416.340.
SECTION 24. ORS 270.030 is amended to read:
270.030. (1) Notwithstanding ORS [270.010 (2) or] 270.100 to 270.190, a state agency may transfer,
convey, donate, exchange or lease to an eligible Indian tribe, as defined in ORS 307.181, any real
property or interest in real property owned by the agency at such price and on such terms as the
agency may determine.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 15

(2) Notwithstanding ORS 273.775 to 273.790, an agency disposing of real property or interest in
real property under this section also may convey the mineral and geothermal resource rights in the
real property to the Indian tribe.
URBAN RESERVES
SECTION 25. (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall amend its rules related to the prioritization of lands being added to an
urban reserve in order to allow local governments to assign lower priority to land for which
the provision of future urban services, as defined in ORS 195.065, is not reasonable or cost
effective due to existing topographical or other physical constraints including built con-
straints.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision in ORS 183.325 to 183.410, rules adopted under this
section shall be adopted without an advisory committee.
RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT ON COMMERCIAL LANDS
SECTION 26. ORS 197A.445 is amended to read:
197A.445. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Affordable housing” means residential property:
(A) In which:
(i) Each unit on the property is made available to own or rent to families with incomes of 80
percent or less of the area median income;
(ii) The average of all units on the property is made available to families with incomes of 60
percent or less of the area median income; or
(iii) A manufactured dwelling park is operated that serves only households with incomes of 120
percent or less of the area median income; and
(B) Whose affordability, including affordability under a covenant as described in ORS 456.270 to
456.295, is enforceable for a duration of no less than 30 years.
(b) “Area median income” means the median income for the metropolitan statistical area in
which housing is located as determined by the Housing and Community Services Department and
adjusted for household size based on information from the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development.
(2) A local government shall allow affordable housing if the proposed affordable housing is on
property that is:
(a) Owned by:
(A) A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109;
(B) A nonprofit corporation that is organized as a religious corporation;
(C) A nonprofit corporation that is organized as a public benefit corporation whose primary
purpose is the development of affordable housing;
(D) A housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005; or
(E) A manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative, as defined in ORS 62.803; or
(b) Zoned:
(A) For commercial uses;
(B) To allow religious assembly; or
(C) As public lands.
(3) A local government shall allow the conversion of a building or a portion of a building from
a commercial use to a residential use.
(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section:
(a) Prohibit the local government from requiring a zone change or conditional use permit before
allowing the use.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 16

(b) Do not trigger any requirement that a local government consider or update an analysis as
required by a statewide planning goal relating to economic development.
(c) Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection, do not apply on lands where the local
government determines that:
(A) The development on the property cannot be adequately served by water, sewer, storm water
drainage or streets, or will not be adequately served at the time that development on the lot is
complete;
(B) The property contains a slope of 25 percent or greater;
(C) The property is within a 100-year floodplain; or
(D) The development of the property is constrained by land use regulations based on statewide
land use planning goals relating to:
(i) Natural disasters and hazards; or
(ii) Natural resources, including air, water, land or natural areas, but not including open spaces
or historic resources.
(d) Do apply to property described in paragraph (c)(C) and (D)(i) of this subsection if more than
60 percent of the lands within the urban growth boundary that the property is within are located
within a tsunami inundation zone or if more than 30 percent of the lands within the urban growth
boundary that the property is within are located within a 100-year floodplain.
(5) The development of housing under subsection (2) of this section may occur only:
(a) Within an urban growth boundary; and
(b) On lands zoned to allow for industrial uses only if the property is:
(A) Publicly owned;
(B) Adjacent to lands zoned for residential uses or schools; and
(C) Not specifically designated for heavy industrial uses.
(6) The development of housing under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Applies only within an urban growth boundary of a city with a population of 10,000 or
greater;
(b) May not occur on lands zoned to allow industrial uses;
(c) May require the payment of a system development charge as defined in ORS 223.299 only if:
(A) The charge is calculated pursuant to a specific adopted policy for commercial to residential
conversions adopted on or before December 31, 2023; or
(B) The charge is for water or wastewater and includes an offset for at least 100 percent of the
water or wastewater system development charges paid when the building was originally constructed;
and
(d) May not be subject to enforcement of any land use regulation that establishes a minimum
number of parking spaces that is greater than the lesser of:
(A) The amount that may be required for the existing commercial use; or
(B) The amount that may be required in lands zoned for residential uses that would allow the
converted development.
(7) The development of housing allowed under subsection (4)(d) of this section may only occur:
(a) Within an urban growth boundary located no more than 10 miles from the Pacific Ocean;
(b) In areas that require compliance with minimum federal regulations under the National Flood
Insurance Program or with local floodplain development regulations adopted by the applicable local
government, provided that the local regulations are equal to or more stringent than the minimum
federal regulations;
(c) In locations that do not include floodways or other areas with higher risks of greater water
velocity and debris flow;
(d) In communities with emergency response, evacuation and post-disaster plans that have been
updated for the housing development; and
(e) In areas that are not public parks.
(8) A local government may prohibit affordable housing or require a zone change or conditional
use permit to develop affordable housing in areas described in subsection (4)(d) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 17

(9)(a) An applicant who applies to develop affordable housing under this section within a
planned mixed-use development shall, if the development would cause the amount of lands
available for commercial uses within the planned mixed-use development to be reduced to
less than 80 percent of the amount in the adopted planned mixed-use development, amend
the planned mixed-use development to allow an additional area not smaller than the proposed
housing development.
(b) As used in this subsection, “planned mixed-use development” means an area of land:
(A) Larger than 10 acres; and
(B) Subject to a land use approval or binding development agreement adopted by the local
government that establishes areas or minimum acreages for commercial uses and includes
residential or other uses.
[(9)] (10) A local government shall approve an application at an authorized density level and
authorized height level, as defined in ORS 227.175 (4), for the development of affordable housing, at
the greater of:
(a) Any local density bonus for affordable housing; or
(b) Without consideration of any local density bonus for affordable housing:
(A) For property with existing maximum density of 16 or fewer units per acre, 200 percent of
the existing density and 12 additional feet;
(B) For property with existing maximum density of 17 or more units per acre and 45 or fewer
units per acre, 150 percent of the existing density and 24 additional feet; or
(C) For property with existing maximum density of 46 or more units per acre, 125 percent of the
existing density and 36 additional feet.
[(10)(a)] (11)(a) Subsection [(9)] (10) of this section does not apply to housing allowed under
subsection (2) of this section in areas that are not zoned for residential uses.
(b) A local government may reduce the density or height of the density bonus allowed under
subsection [(9)] (10) of this section as necessary to address a health, safety or habitability issue,
including fire safety, or to comply with a protective measure adopted pursuant to a statewide land
use planning goal. Notwithstanding ORS 197.350, the local government must adopt findings sup-
ported by substantial evidence demonstrating the necessity of this reduction.
TECHNICAL FIXES
SECTION 27. ORS 92.031 is amended to read:
92.031. (1) As used in this section, “middle housing land division” means a partition or subdivi-
sion of a lot or parcel on which the development of middle housing is allowed under ORS 197A.420
(2) or (3) or 197A.421.
(2) A city or county shall approve a tentative plan for a middle housing land division if the ap-
plication includes:
(a) Separate utilities, other than water or wastewater, for each dwelling unit;
(b) A proposal for development of middle housing that is in compliance or must comply with the
Oregon residential specialty code and land use regulations under ORS 197A.420 (5) that are appli-
cable to the original lot or parcel and which may consist of:
(A) A single duplex, triplex, quadplex, cottage cluster or structure containing townhouses;
(B) Additional units as allowed by ORS 197A.421 (3); and
(C) Retained or rehabilitated existing units allowed under ORS 197A.420 (4), if any;
(c) Proposed easements necessary for each dwelling unit on the plan for:
(A) Locating, accessing, replacing and servicing all utilities;
(B) Pedestrian access from each dwelling unit to a private or public road;
(C) Any common use areas or shared building elements;
(D) Any dedicated driveways or parking; and
(E) Any dedicated common area;
(d) Exactly one dwelling unit on each resulting lot or parcel, except for:
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 18

(A) Lots, parcels or tracts used as common areas; or
(B) Lots or parcels with a detached single-unit dwelling and accessory dwelling unit or a duplex
as allowed under ORS 197A.420 (4); and
(e) Evidence demonstrating how buildings or structures on a resulting lot or parcel will comply
with applicable building codes provisions relating to new property lines and, notwithstanding the
creation of new lots or parcels, how structures or buildings located on the newly created lots or
parcels will comply with the Oregon residential specialty code.
(3) A city or county may add conditions to the approval of a tentative plan for a middle housing
land division to:
(a) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, prohibit the further division of the resulting lots or
parcels.
(b) Require that a notation appear on the final plat indicating that the approval was given under
this section.
(4) In reviewing an application for a middle housing land division, a city or county:
(a) Shall apply the procedures applicable to an expedited land division under ORS 197A.140, if
requested by the applicant and without regard to the criteria in ORS 197A.142 (1).
(b) May require street frontage improvements where a resulting lot or parcel abuts the street
consistent with land use regulations implementing ORS 197A.420.
(c) May not subject an application to approval criteria except as provided in this section, in-
cluding that a lot or parcel require driveways, vehicle access, parking or minimum or maximum
street frontage.
(d) May not subject the application to procedures, ordinances or regulations adopted under ORS
92.044 or 92.046 that are inconsistent with this section or, only if requested by the applicant, ORS
197A.140.
(e) Shall allow the submission of an application for a tentative plan for a middle housing land
division before, after or at the same time as the submission of an application for building permits
for the middle housing.
(f) May require the dedication of right of way if the original parcel did not previously provide
a dedication.
(g) May require separate water and wastewater utilities for each dwelling unit.
(h) Shall allow any existing units allowed under ORS 197A.420 (4) to be considered a single
middle housing unit and allow for the unit to be allocated its own lot or parcel by the division.
(5) The type of middle housing developed on the original parcel is not altered by a middle
housing land division.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 197A.425 (1) and subsection (4)(d) and (e) of this section, a city or
county may prohibit or add approval criteria to the allowance of a new accessory dwelling unit on,
or a subsequent middle housing land division of, a lot or parcel resulting from a middle housing land
division:
(a) To the extent allowed under this section and ORS 197A.420; and
(b) Provided that the middle housing land division lots or parcels may be used to create housing
that is at or above the minimum density for the zoning of the land.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 92.010 to 92.192, within the same calendar year
as an original partition that was not a middle housing land division, a city or county may allow one
or more of the resulting vacant parcels to be further partitioned into not more than three parcels
through a middle housing land division.
(8) The tentative approval of a middle housing land division is void if and only if a final subdi-
vision or partition plat is not approved within:
(a) Three years [of] following the tentative approval; or
(b) A period equal to that allowed by the city or county for the plat or plan that is sub-
mitted concurrently with the division as described in ORS 92.044.
(9) Nothing in this section prohibits a city or county from requiring a final plat before issuing
building permits.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 19

SECTION 28. ORS 197A.140 is amended to read:
197A.140. Notwithstanding any other requirement applicable to a land use decision under ORS
chapter 197 or 197A, for an application that is reviewed as an expedited land division based on the
request of the applicant:
(1) A decision is not subject to the requirements of ORS 197.797.
(2) A local government:
(a) Shall make a decision to approve or deny the application within 63 days of receiving a
completed application as described in ORS [215.246] 215.427 or 227.178, based on whether the ap-
plication satisfies the substantive requirements of the applicable land use regulations. An approval
may include conditions to ensure that the application meets the applicable land use regulations.
(b) May not hold a hearing on the application or allow any third party to intervene to oppose
the application.
(c) Shall issue a written determination of compliance or noncompliance with applicable land use
regulations that includes a summary statement explaining the determination. The summary state-
ment may be in any form reasonably intended to communicate the local government’s basis for the
determination. The determination must include an explanation of the applicant’s right to appeal the
determination under ORS 197.830 to 197.855.
(d) Shall provide notice of the decision to the applicant but may not require that notice be given
to any other person.
(e) May assess an application fee calculated to recover the estimated full cost of processing an
application based on the estimated average cost of such applications. Within one year of establishing
a fee under this section, the city or county shall review and revise the fee, if necessary, to reflect
actual experience in processing expedited land decisions.
(3) Only the applicant may appeal an expedited land division made under this section.
SECTION 29. Section 22, chapter 476, Oregon Laws 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 22. (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the Land Conservation and Development Commission
shall adopt rules that must include:
(a) Prohibiting or restricting siting and design standards that prevent or discourage, or have the
effect of preventing or discouraging, the siting of middle housing that is manufactured, site-built or
prefabricated;
(b) Establishing parameters on unreasonable cost or delay for siting and design standards for
accessory dwelling units and single room occupancies under standards allowed under ORS 197A.425
and 197A.430;
(c) Regulating cottage clusters for the purposes of incentivizing the provision of smaller, less
expensive housing, shared community amenities and other public benefits and including regulations
that implement the term “small footprint or floor area” as used within the definition of cottage
clusters in ORS 197A.420;
(d) Amending siting and design parameters for middle housing types;
(e) Amending permissible discretionary criteria applied by local government in evaluating
housing under ORS 197A.400 (3);
(f) Developing model system development charges for residential development types for optional
adoption or incorporation by local governments; and
(g) Establishing procedures to estimate the reasonable zoned housing capacity of an area as part
of an inventory of buildable lands or housing capacity under ORS 197A.270, 197A.280 and 197A.350.
(2) In adopting rules under this section, the commission shall:
(a) Emphasize improving the efficiency of the development process with a focus on increasing
housing production, availability and affordability, especially that of middle housing, accessory
dwelling units and single room occupancies.
(b) To the extent practicable, implement recommendations in the reports produced under section
5 (1) to (3), chapter 110, Oregon Laws 2024.
(c) Implement the principles in ORS 197A.025.
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 20

(d) Adopt operative and applicable dates for the rules, subject to section 3, chapter 639, Oregon
Laws 2019.
[(e)] (3) The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall provide a report on
or before July 1, 2028, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to land use,
in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, on the feasibility and advisability of providing safe harbor
protections for cities that use the commission’s model system development charges under subsection
(1)(f) of this section or otherwise incentivizing the use of the models.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 30. The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 31. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 18, 2026 Received by Governor:
Repassed by House March 5, 2026 ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
..................................................................................
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
Passed by Senate March 4, 2026
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate ..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4037 (HB 4037-B) Page 21